Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201570-1801
Act, how cited.

Sections 70-1801 to 70-1819 shall be known and may be cited as the Public Entities Mandated Project Charges Act.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB141, § 1.
May 14, 2015